District of Columbia statutes.
15-105

Decree confirming sale of property; effect; ordering conveyance.

A decree confirming the sale of real or personal property sold pursuant to a decree, divests the right, title, or interest sold out of the former owner, party to the action, and vests it in the purchaser, without any conveyance by the officer or agent of the court conducting the sale. The decree constitutes notice to all persons of the transfer of title when a copy thereof is registered among the land-records of the District. In particular cases, the court may order its officer or agent to make a conveyance, if that mode is deemed preferable.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 523, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Deficiency decrees in cases of mortgage foreclosures, see § 42-816.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-105.
1973 Ed., § 15-105.